Utah statutes.
73-20-11.   Transfer of funds -- Purposes.

(1)  On the effective date of this act $1,500,000 shall be transferred from
the Emergency Water Resources Account created under Section 73-20-8 and
initially funded under Section 73-20-9 to the water and power board
construction fund proper.
(2)  The balance remaining in the Emergency Water Resources Account after the
transfer authorized by Subsection (1) of this section may be used for all
purposes provided for under Title 73, Chapter 20 through December 31, 1978.
Any amount in this account then remaining uncommitted shall be transferred
immediately to the water and power board construction fund proper.
(3)  Any amounts so transferred under Subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall be substantially used initially for agriculturally-related projects.
